Missouri, session 2026, HB3478.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 442.145, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 442.145, to read as follows:
442.145. 1. For the purposes of sections 442.150 to 442.360, a person [may] shall
personally appear before the officer taking the acknowledgment by:
(1) Being in the same physical location as another person and close enough to see,
hear, communicate with, and exchange tangible identification credentials with that individual;
or
(2) Interacting with another individual by means of communication technology that
complies with the provisions of sections 486.600 to 486.1205.
2. The acknowledging officer shall designate in the acknowledgment form, as
provided in section 442.210, [whether] that the principal personally appeared before the
officer pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of this section. In cases of a personal
appearance under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section, it shall be deemed in
compliance with sections 442.150 to 442.360 if the acknowledging officer amends the
acknowledgment form to read "before me personally appears by means of communication of
technology".
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3478 2
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to conveyances of land, including
real property, made through a will if the terms of the will are clearly defined.
✔